Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Chapter 1. Appointment, General Powers, and Duties

§ 1.
Composition of Department.

The Department of Public Service shall consist of the Commissioner of Public Service, a Director for Regulated Utility Planning, a Director for Public Advocacy, a Director for Energy Efficiency, a Director for Telecommunications and Connectivity, and such other persons as the Commissioner considers necessary to conduct the business of the Department.

The Commissioner shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. The Commissioner shall serve for a term of two years beginning on February 1 of the year in which the appointment is made. The Commissioner shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The Directors for Regulated Utility Planning, for Public Advocacy, and for Energy Efficiency shall be appointed by the Commissioner. The Director for Telecommunications and Connectivity shall be appointed by the Commissioner in consultation with the Secretary of Administration.

The Directors for Public Advocacy and for Telecommunications and Connectivity may employ, with the approval of the Commissioner, legal counsel and other experts, and clerical assistance, and the Directors for Regulated Utility Planning and for Energy Efficiency may employ, with the approval of the Commissioner, experts and clerical assistance.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 38, 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1989, No. 238

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 4, 1990;

2015, No. 41

, § 2.

§ 2.
Department powers.

The Department of Public Service shall supervise and direct the execution of all laws relating to public service corporations and firms and individuals engaged in such business, including the:

formation, organization, ownership, and acquisition of facilities of public service corporations under chapter 3 of this title;

participation in planning for proper utility service as provided in section 202 of this title through the Director for Regulated Utility Planning;

supervision and evaluation under chapters 5 and 77 of this title of the quality of service of public utility companies;

interconnection and interchange of facilities of electric companies under sections 210, 213, and 214 of this title;

representation of the State in the negotiations and proceedings for the procurement of electric energy from any source outside this State and from any generation facility inside the State under sections 211 and 212 of this title;

review of proposed changes in rate schedules and petition to the Public Utility Commission, and representation of the interests of the consuming public in proceedings to change rate schedules of public service companies under chapter 5 of this title;

siting of electric generation and transmission facilities under section 248 of this title;

consolidations and mergers of public service corporations under chapter 7 of this title;

supervision and regulation of cable television systems under chapter 13 of this title;

supervision and regulation of telegraph and telephone companies under chapters 71, 73, and 75 of this title;

supervision and regulation of the organization and operation of municipal plants under chapter 79 of this title; and

supervision and regulation of the organization and operation of electric cooperatives under chapter 81 of this title.

In cases requiring hearings by the Commission, the Department, through the Director for Public Advocacy, shall represent the interests of the people of the State, unless otherwise specified by law. In any hearing, the Commission may, if it determines that the public interest would be served, request the Attorney General or a member of the Vermont bar to represent the public or the State. In addition, the Department may intervene, appear, and participate in Federal Energy Regulatory Commission proceedings, Federal Communications Commission proceedings, or other federal administrative proceedings on behalf of the Vermont public.

The Department may bring proceedings on its own motion before the Public Utility Commission, with respect to any matter within the jurisdiction of the Public Utility Commission, and may initiate rulemaking proceedings before that Commission. The Public Utility Commission, with respect to any matter within its jurisdiction, may issue orders on its own motion and may initiate rulemaking proceedings.

In any proceeding where the decommissioning fund for the Vermont Yankee Nuclear Facility is involved, the Department shall represent the consuming public in a manner that acknowledges that the general public interest requires that the consuming public, rather than either the State’s future consumers who never obtain benefits from the facility or the State’s taxpayers, ought to provide for all costs of decommissioning. The Department shall seek to have the decommissioning fund be based on all reasonably expected costs.

The Commissioner of Public Service (the Commissioner) will work with the Director of the Office of Economic Opportunity (the Director), the Commissioner of Housing and Community Development, the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board (VHCB), the Vermont Housing Finance Agency (VHFA), the Vermont Community Action Partnership, and the efficiency entity or entities appointed under subdivision 209(d)(2) of this title and such other affected persons or entities as the Commissioner considers relevant to improve the energy efficiency of both single- and multi-family affordable housing units, including multi-family housing units previously funded by VHCB and VHFA and subject to the Multifamily Energy Design Standards adopted by the VHCB and VHFA. In consultation with the other entities identified in this subsection, the Commissioner and the Director together shall report twice to the House Committee on Energy and Technology and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy, on or before January 31, 2015 and 2017, respectively, on their joint efforts to improve energy savings of affordable housing units and increase the number of units assisted, including their efforts to:

simplify access to funding and other resources for energy efficiency and renewable energy available for single- and multi-family affordable housing. For the purpose of this subsection, “renewable energy” shall have the same meaning as under section 8002 of this title;

ensure the delivery of energy services in a manner that is timely, comprehensive, and cost-effective;

implement the energy efficiency standards applicable to single- and multi-family affordable housing;

measure the results and performance of energy improvements;

develop guidance for the owners and residents of affordable housing to maximize energy savings from improvements; and

determine how to enhance energy efficiency resources for the affordable housing sector in a manner that avoids or reduces the need for assistance under 33 V.S.A. chapter 26 (home heating fuel assistance).

In performing its duties under this section, the Department shall give heightened consideration to the interests of ratepayer classes who are not independently represented parties in proceedings before the Commission, including residential, low-income, and small business consumers, as well as other consumers whose interests might otherwise not be adequately represented but for the Department’s advocacy.

In all forums affecting policy and decision making for the New England region’s electric system, including matters before the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission and the Independent System Operator of New England, the Department of Public Service shall advance positions that are consistent with the statutory policies and goals set forth in

10 V.S.A. §§ 578

, 580, and 581 and sections 202a, 8001, 8004, and 8005 of this title. In those forums, the Department also shall advance positions that avoid or minimize adverse consequences to Vermont and its ratepayers from regional and inter-regional cost allocation for transmission projects. This subsection shall not compel the Department to initiate or participate in litigation and shall not preclude the Department from entering into agreements that represent a reasonable advance to these statutory policies and goals.

The Department shall investigate when it receives a complaint that there has been noncompliance with section 246, 248, 248a, or 8010 of this title, any rule adopted pursuant to those sections, or any certificate of public good issued pursuant to those sections, including a complaint of such noncompliance received pursuant to section 208 of this title or the complaint protocol established under 2016 Acts and Resolves No. 130, Sec. 5c.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1989, No. 296

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. June 29, 1990;

2013, No. 89

, § 12a;

2013, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 5, eff. Feb. 4, 2014;

2013, No. 99

(Adj. Sess.), § 9a, eff. April 1, 2014;

2015, No. 11

, § 31;

2015, No. 56

, § 22;

2017, No. 53

, § 7;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 173.

§ 3.
Public Utility Commission.

The Vermont Public Utility Commission shall consist of a chair and two members. The Chair and each member shall not be required to be admitted to the practice of law in this State.

The Chair shall be nominated, appointed, and confirmed in the manner of a Superior judge.

Members of the Commission other than the Chair shall be appointed in accordance with this subsection. Whenever a vacancy occurs, public announcement of the vacancy shall be made. The Governor shall submit at least five names of potential nominees to the Judicial Nominating Board for review. The Judicial Nominating Board shall review the candidates in respect to judicial criteria and standards only and shall recommend to the Governor those candidates the Board considers qualified. The Governor shall make the appointment from the list of qualified candidates. The appointment shall be subject to the advice and consent of the Senate.

The term of each member shall be six years.
(d) (1) The term of each member shall be six years.

Any appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for the unexpired portion of the term vacated.

A chair wishing to succeed himself or herself in office may seek reappointment under the terms of subsection (b) of this section.
(3) (A) A chair wishing to succeed himself or herself in office may seek reappointment under the terms of subsection (b) of this section.

The Governor may reappoint a member of the Commission other than the Chair at the expiration of that member’s term, subject to the advice and consent of the Senate.

Notwithstanding

3 V.S.A. § 2004

, or any other provision of law, members of the Commission may be removed only for cause. When a Commission member who hears all or a substantial part of a case retires from office before such case is completed, he or she shall remain a member of the Commission for the purpose of concluding and deciding such case, and signing the findings, orders, decrees, and judgments therein. A retiring chair shall also remain a member for the purpose of certifying questions of law if appeal is taken. For such service, he or she shall receive a reasonable compensation to be fixed by the remaining members of the Commission and necessary expenses while on official business.

A case shall be deemed completed when the Commission enters a final order therein even though such order is appealed to the Supreme Court and the case remanded by that Court to the Commission. Upon remand the Commission then in office may in its discretion consider relevant evidence including any part of the transcript of testimony in the proceedings prior to appeal.

The Chair shall have general charge of the offices and employees of the Commission.

The Clerk may appoint and assign a former Commission member to sit on specific Commission cases when some or all of the regular members are disqualified or otherwise unable to serve. In making assignments, the Clerk shall begin with the former Commissioner who left service most recently and then, as needed, proceed to the next most recently serving former Commissioner. Former Commissioners shall receive pay in accordance with subsection (e) of this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), (c), eff. March 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1985, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 25, 1986;

1993, No. 21

, § 1, eff. May 12, 1993;

2017, No. 53

, § 9;

2019, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2021, No. 42

, § 3.

§ 4.
Qualifications of members, commissioners, and clerk.

A person in the employ of or holding any official relation to any company subject to the supervision of the Commission, or engaged in the management of such company, or owning stock, bonds, or other securities thereof, or who is, in any manner, connected with the operation of such company in this State, shall not be a member or clerk of the Commission or Commissioner of Public Service; nor shall any person holding the office of member, clerk of the Commission, or Commissioner of Public Service personally or in connection with a partner or agent, render professional service for or against or make or perform any business contract with any company subject to such supervision, relating to the business of such company, except contracts made with them as common carriers or in regular course of public service; nor shall such person, directly or indirectly, receive from any such company any commission, present, or reward.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Feb. 1, 1981.

§ 5.
Clerk; oath.

The Commission shall appoint a clerk, who shall serve during its pleasure.
The Commission members and clerk shall be sworn to the faithful discharge of the duties of their offices and, before entering upon the same, shall file a certificate of their oaths for record in the Office of the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), (c), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 6.
Powers and duties of clerk.

The clerk shall have the custody of the seal of the Commission, keep a full record of its proceedings, file and preserve at its office all documents and papers entrusted to his or her care, prepare such papers and notices as may be required by the Commission, and perform such other duties as it may prescribe. The clerk shall have power, under the direction of the Commission, to issue subpoenas for witnesses and to administer oaths in all cases before the Commission or pertaining to the duties of the office.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 21

, § 2, eff. May 12, 1993.

§ 7.
Quorum; meetings.

Two Commission members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business. Meetings of the Commission may be held at any time or place within the State upon call of the Chair or the other two members, after a reasonable notice to the other members, and shall be held at such times and places as in the judgment of the Commission will best serve the convenience of all parties in interest.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(a), (b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 21

, § 3, eff. May 12, 1993.

§ 8.
Powers of single Commission member or other officer or employee.

One Commission member or any officer or employee of the Commission duly appointed by the Chair of the Commission may inquire into and examine any matter within the jurisdiction of the Commission.

A hearing officer may administer oaths in all cases, so far as the exercise of that power is properly incidental to the performance of his or her duty or that of the Commission. A hearing officer may hold any hearing in any matter within the jurisdiction of the Commission to hear.

A hearing officer shall report his or her findings of fact in writing to the Commission in the form of a proposal for decision. A copy shall be served upon the parties pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 811

. However, judgment on such findings shall be rendered only by a majority of the Commission.

At least 12 days prior to a hearing before the Commission or a hearing officer, the Commission shall give written notice of the time and place of the hearing to all parties to the case and shall indicate the name and title of the person designated to conduct the hearing.

Upon written request to the Commission at least five days prior to the hearing by all parties to the case, the Chair shall appoint at least a majority of the Commission to conduct the hearing.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, the Chair may appoint a hearing officer to hear and finally determine any consumer complaint where the amount in controversy does not exceed $2,000.00. Upon petition of a party, filed within 30 days of issuance of the hearing officer’s decision and order, or on its own motion, the Commission may determine that the hearing officer’s decision and order should be treated as a proposal for decision and order as provided in subsection (c) of this section. The Commission may grant such request for good cause, including apparent error of fact, or procedural or substantive law, and may conduct additional evidentiary hearings or hear oral argument from the parties. If such request is not timely made, or is not granted by the Commission, the decision and order of the hearing officer shall become the final decision and order of the Commission.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), (c), eff. March 1, 1961;

1971, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 28, 1972;

1973, No. 96

;

1993, No. 21

, § 4, eff. May 12, 1993.

§ 9.
Court of record; seal.

The Commission shall have the powers of a court of record in the determination and adjudication of all matters over which it is given jurisdiction.
It may render judgments, make orders and decrees, and enforce the same by any suitable process issuable by courts in this State. The Commission shall have an official seal on which shall be the words, “State of Vermont.
Public Utility Commission. Official Seal.”

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 10.
Service of process; notice of hearings; temporary restraining orders.

All processes issued by the Commission shall state the time and place of return, in those cases where return is to be made to the Commission. Orders, notices, and other processes issued by the Commission shall be served personally or by first class mail, except that the Commission may direct that service be made by registered or certified mail. If the whereabouts of a person are unknown, or if the number of respondents is so great that personal service or service by mail is impracticable, service may be made by publication.

Except as provided in subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this section, the Commission shall give 12 days’ notice of all hearings.

A scheduling or procedural conference may be held upon any reasonable notice.

An evidentiary hearing, once commenced upon proper notice, may be continued to a subsequent date upon any reasonable notice.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, the Commission or a single member may grant temporary restraining orders in the manner provided by and subject to limitations prescribed by the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.

The provisions of sections 110-124 of this title relating to process and notice in condemnation cases shall not be affected by this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 186

, § 1, eff. May 20, 1959;

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1975, No. 59

, § 1, eff. April 18, 1975;

1975, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1985, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.);

1993, No. 21

, § 5, eff. May 12, 1993;

2019, No. 31

, § 22.

§ 11.
Pleadings; rules of practice; hearings; findings of fact.

The forms, pleadings, and rules of practice and procedure before the Commission shall be prescribed by it. The Commission shall adopt rules that include, among other things, provisions that:

A utility whose rates are suspended under the provisions of section 226 of this title shall, within 30 days from the date of the suspension order, file with the Commission all exhibits it intends to use in the hearing thereon together with the names of witnesses it intends to produce in its direct case and a short statement of the purposes of the testimony of each witness. Except in the discretion of the Commission, a utility shall not be permitted to introduce into evidence in its direct case exhibits which are not filed in accordance with this rule.

A scheduling conference shall be ordered in every contested rate case. At such conference the Commission may require the State or any person opposing such rate increase to specify what items shown by the filed exhibits are conceded. Further proof of conceded items shall not be required.

The Commission shall allow all members of the public to attend each of its hearings unless the hearing is for the sole purpose of considering information to be treated as confidential pursuant to a protective order duly adopted by the Commission.

The Commission shall make all reasonable efforts to ensure that the location of each hearing is sufficient to accommodate all members of the public seeking to attend.

The Commission shall ensure that the public may safely attend the hearing, including obtaining such resources as may be necessary to fulfill this obligation.

The Commission shall hear all matters within its jurisdiction and make its findings of fact. It shall state its rulings of law when they are excepted to. Upon appeal to the Supreme Court, its findings of fact shall be accepted unless clearly erroneous.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 211, eff. March 29, 1972;

2013, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2015, No. 23

, § 134;

2017, No. 53

, § 13a;

2019, No. 31

, § 21.

§ 11a.
Electronic filing and issuance.

As used in this section:

“Confidential document” means a document containing information for which confidentiality has been asserted and that has been filed with the Commission and parties in a proceeding subject to a protective order duly issued by the Commission.

“Document” means information inscribed on a tangible medium or stored in an electronic or other medium and retrievable in perceivable form.

“Electronic filing” means the transmission of documents to the Commission by electronic means.

“Electronic filing system” means a Commission-designated system that provides for the electronic filing of documents with the Commission and for the electronic issuance of documents by the Commission. If the system provides for the filing or issuance of confidential documents, it shall be capable of maintaining the confidentiality of confidential documents and of limiting access to confidential documents to individuals explicitly authorized to access such confidential documents.

“Electronic issuance” means:

the transmission by electronic means of a document that the Commission has issued, including an order, proposal for decision, or notice; or

the transmission of a message from the Commission by electronic means informing the recipients that the Commission has issued a document, including an order, proposal for decision, or notice, and that it is available for viewing and retrieval from an electronic filing system.

“Electronic means” means any Commission-authorized method of electronic transmission of a document.

The Commission by order, rule, procedure, or practice may:

provide for electronic issuance of any notice, order, proposal for decision, or other process issued by the Commission, notwithstanding any other service requirements set forth in this title or in 10 V.S.A. chapter 43;

require electronic filing of documents with the Commission;

for any filing or submittal to the Commission for which the filing or submitting entity is required to provide notice or a copy to another State agency under this title or under 10 V.S.A. chapter 43, waive such requirement if the State agency will receive notice of and access to the filing or submittal through an electronic filing system; and

for any filing, order, proposal for decision, notice, or other process required to be served or delivered by first-class mail or personal delivery under this title or under 10 V.S.A. chapter 43, waive such requirement to the extent the required recipients will receive the filing, order, proposal of decision, notice, or other process by electronic means or will receive notice of and access to the filing, order, proposal of decision, notice, or other process through an electronic filing system.

Any order, rule, procedure, or practice issued under subsection (b) of this section shall include exceptions to accommodate parties and other participants who are unable to file or receive documents by electronic means.

Subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to the requirements for service of citations and notices in writing as set forth in sections 111(b), 111a(i), and 2804 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Feb. 4, 2014.

§ 12.
Review by Supreme Court.

A party to a cause who feels aggrieved by the final order, judgment, or decree of the Commission may appeal to the Supreme Court. However, the Commission, in its discretion and before final judgment, may permit an appeal to be taken by any party to the Supreme Court for determination of questions of law in such manner as the Supreme Court may by rule provide for appeals before final judgment from a Superior Court. Notwithstanding the provisions of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure or the Vermont Rules of Appellate Procedure, neither the time for filing a notice of appeal nor the filing of a notice of appeal, as provided herein, shall operate as a stay of enforcement of an order of the Commission unless the Commission or the Supreme Court grants a stay under the provisions of section 14 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1967, No. 205

, § 1;

1971, No. 242

(Adj. Sess.);

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 188.

§ 13.
Repealed.
1967, No. 205, § 3.

§ 14.
Powers of Supreme Court.

The Supreme Court may reverse or affirm the judgments, orders, or decrees of the Commission and may remand a cause to it with such mandates, as law or equity shall require; and the Commission shall enter judgment, order, or decree in accordance with such mandates.
The transfer of the cause to the Supreme Court shall not vacate any judgment, order, or decree of the Commission, but the Supreme Court or, when not in session, a Justice thereof upon notice to interested parties, may suspend execution of the same as justice and equity require, unless otherwise specifically provided by law; provided, however, that the execution of rate orders shall not be suspended at the request of a utility unless the utility files with the Commission a bond running to the members of the Commission and their successors in office in an amount and with sureties approved by the Court or a Justice thereof conditioned that within 30 days after the termination of the proceedings the company shall repay to the persons from whom collected and after the effective date of the Commission’s final order all sums in excess of the rates finally determined to be just and reasonable.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 263

, § 4(c), eff. July 31, 1961.

§ 15.
Decree of Commission; enforcement.

A party to an order or decree of the Public Utility Commission or the Commission itself, or both, may complain to the Supreme Court for relief against any disobedience of or noncompliance with such order or decree.
In such proceedings and upon such notice thereof to the parties as it shall direct, the Supreme Court shall hear and consider such petition and make such order and decree in the premises by way of writ of mandamus, writ of prohibition, injunction, or otherwise, concerning the enforcement of such order and decree of the Public Utility Commission as to law and equity shall appertain.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 16.
Repealed.
1959, No. 186, § 2, eff. May 20, 1959.

§ 17.
Fees of witnesses; duties of clerk.

The fees of witnesses before the Commission shall be the same as in the Superior Court.
In all causes in behalf of or for the convenience or safety of the public, and in the investigation of accidents, the fees of witnesses and the expense of summoning them shall be paid by the clerk of the Commission.
From time to time, the clerk shall make requisition on the Commissioner of Finance and Management for money to pay such fees and expenses, and the Commissioner of Finance and Management shall issue warrants therefor. The clerk shall quarterly, on February, May, August, and November 1, render to the Commissioner of Finance and Management an account of his or her receipts and disbursements under this section, and pay any unexpended balance into the State Treasury.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1983, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5(b).

§ 18.
Production and examination of books; witnesses.

So far as is necessary for the performance of its duties, the Public Utility Commission or the Commissioner of Public Service, the Directors for Public Advocacy and Regulated Utility Planning, and any other employee of the Department authorized by the Commissioner shall have power to examine the books, accounts, and papers of any company, receiver, trustee, or lessee owning or operating any line, plant, or property, subject to the Commission’s or the Department’s jurisdiction that in any way relate to or contain entries, data, or memoranda concerning any transaction substantially affecting the interests of the State of Vermont or consumers of utility services within the State, to subpoena witnesses, to administer oaths to them, and to examine them on all matters of which the Commission or Department has jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 183

, § 1;

1971, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 28, 1972;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1983, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 19.
Experts.

With the approval of the Governor, the Commission may appoint and employ, at the expense of the State, engineers, accountants, legal counsel, and such number of clerks, stenographers, experts, and temporary employees as it deems necessary in the performance of its duties and in the investigation of matters within its jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1971, No. 191

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.